src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! # Noun inflection


!! Moksha language nouns inflect in cases.

!!!!!!!!!
!! NOUNS 
!!!!!!!!!

!LEXICON NTag
! N_ ;
LEXICON N_
+Sg+Nom+Indef+TYÄ: ENDLEX;

LEXICON N-IS-PRL_
+SP+Prl: K ;
+SP+Prl: OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-VOWEL/NO-VOWEL ;

LEXICON N_AVA_DIAL
+Dial+Use/NG+Err/Orth: N_AVA ;
LEXICON N_OSH_DIAL
+Dial+Use/NG+Err/Orth: N_OSH ;
LEXICON N_SARAZ_DIAL
+Dial+Use/NG+Err/Orth: N_SARAZ ;
!LEXICON N_OFTA_DIAL
!+Dial+Use/NG+Err/Orth: N_OFTA ;
LEXICON N_KAL_DIAL
+Dial+Use/NG+Err/Orth: N_KAL ;

LEXICON N_J_rusmdf
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_PEJ ;
LEXICON N_J_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_PEJ ;
 
LEXICON N_AVA_rusmdf
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_AVA ;
LEXICON N_AVA_rus100_hasnat
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_AVA ;
LEXICON N_AVA_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_AVA ;

LEXICON N_K_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_K ;

LEXICON N_KAL_rusmdf
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_KAL ;

LEXICON N_KAL_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_KAL ;

LEXICON N_FZ_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_OSH ;
LEXICON N_FSS_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_OSH ;
LEXICON N_CH_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_OSH ;
LEXICON N_ROZ1_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_OSH ;
LEXICON N_S1_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_OSH ;
LEXICON N_ZH_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_OSH ;
LEXICON N_SH_rusmdf
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_OSH ;
LEXICON N_SH_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_OSH ;
LEXICON N_OSH_rusmdf
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_OSH ;
LEXICON N_OSH_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_OSH ;

LEXICON N_KIAL1_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_KIAL1 ;

LEXICON N_T1_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_T1 ;

LEXICON N_FT_rusmdf
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_FT ;
LEXICON N_FT_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_FT ;

LEXICON N_BT_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_BT ;

LEXICON N_BN_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_BN ;

LEXICON N_FS_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_FS ;

LEXICON N_PEJ_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_PEJ ;

LEXICON N_SARAZ_rus100 !!= @CODE@ homograph of majority language
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_SARAZ ;

LEXICON N_RELAT_AVA
+Relat: N_AVA ;
LEXICON N_AVA
! ава:ава
: NMN_AVA ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

!LEXICON N_AVA-SG
!! ава:ава
!: NMN_AVA-SG ;

LEXICON N_AVA-PL
! ава:ава
: NMN_AVA-PL ;

!LEXICON N_AVA-SG/PL
! ава:ава
!: NMN_AVA-SG/PL ;

LEXICON N_VAL1MIA_IS_KIA_DIMIN
+Dimin: N_VAL1MIA ;
LEXICON N_VAL1MIA
! вальмя:вальмя
: NMN_VAL1MIA ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

!LEXICON N_VAL1MIA-SG
!! вальмя:вальмя
!: NMN_VAL1MIA-SG ;

!LEXICON N_VAL1MIA-PL
!! вальмя:вальмя
!: NMN_VAL1MIA-PL ;

LEXICON N_RELAT_MOKSHA
+Relat: N_MOKSHA ;
LEXICON N_MOKSHA
! мокша:мокш%{АЕØ%}
: NMN_MOKSHA ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

!LEXICON N_MOKSHA-SG
! мокша:мокш%{АЕØ%}
!: NMN_MOKSHA-SG ;

LEXICON N_MOKSHA-PL
! мокша:мокш%{АЕØ%}
: NMN_MOKSHA-PL ;

LEXICON N_PAKSIA
! пакся:пакся
: NMN_PAKSIA ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_PAKSIA ;

!LEXICON N_PAKSIA-SG
!! пакся:пакся
!: NMN_PAKSIA-SG ;

LEXICON N_PAKSIA-PL
!! пакся:пакся
: NMN_PAKSIA-PL ;

LEXICON N_ANDY_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_ANDY ;
LEXICON N_ANDY !!= * @CODE@ анды:анды
: NMN_ANDY ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;
!ара%>%{ИЫЙ%}%>%{DIM%}я

!LEXICON N_ANDY-SG
!! анды:анды
!: NMN_AVA-SG ;

!LEXICON N_ANDY-PL
!! анды:анды
!: NMN_AVA-PL ;

LEXICON N_RELAT_OFTA !!= @CODE@
+Relat: N_OFTA ;
LEXICON N_OFTA !!= @CODE@ 
!!офта:офт%{АОØ%}
!: NMN_OFTA ;
 N_PINGE ;

!LEXICON N_OFTA-SG !!= @CODE@
!: NMN_OFTA-SG ;
LEXICON N_OFTA-PL !!= @CODE@
: NMN_OFTA-PL ;

LEXICON N_PARA !!= @CODE@ 
!!пара:пар%{АОØ%}
!: NMN_PARA ;
 N_KIAD1GE ;

!LEXICON N_PARA-SG !!= @CODE@
!: NMN_PARA-SG ;
!LEXICON N_PARA-PL !!= @CODE@
!: NMN_PARA-PL ;

LEXICON N_RELAT_PANGA
+Relat:  N_PANGA ;

LEXICON N_PANGA !!= @CODE@
!!панга:панг%{АОØ%}
 N_PINGE ;

LEXICON N_PINGE !!= @CODE@
!!пинге:пинг%{ЕОØ%}
!! Indef with vowel: Nom Sg, Gen, Dat, Cmpr, Prl, Tra
: SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!!
+Use/NG: PL-NOM-INDEF ;
+Use/NG: SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;

 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3 ;
 PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3 ; 
 SP-CAU ;
 SP-CMPR ;
 SP-DAT-INDEF ;
 SP-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXPL1 ;
 SP-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXPL2 ;
 SP-GEN-INDEF ;
 SP-ILL-PX ;
 SP-ELA-INDEF ;
 SP-INE ;
 SP-LAT-INDEF ;
 SP-PRL_Ova ;
 SP-TRA-INDEF_Oks ;
!!
!! Floating
: NMN_DECLENSION-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL-FLOAT ;
+Use/NG: SG-GEN-DEF ; !2023-10-14 кядьготь
+Use/NG: NMN_DECLENSION-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL-LOSE-STEM-VOWEL ;
!! Without vowel
:%^RmVow NMN_DECLENSION-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL-LOSE-STEM-VOWEL ;

+Use/NG: SG-NOM-DEF ;
 SP-PRL_Ga ; !2023-08-30 has pair in lose stem vowel
+Use/NG:  SP-ABL ;
:%^RmVow SP-LAT-INDEF ;
! N_KAL ;  Ela, Ill, Ine, Par 
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

LEXICON N_KIAD1GE !!= @CODE@
!!кядьге:кядьг%{ЕОØ%}
!! frequent use of vowel stemm
!! Indef with vowel: Nom Sg, Gen, Dat, Cmpr, Prl, Tra
: SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!!
: PL-NOM-INDEF ;
+Use/NG: SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;

 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3 ;
 PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3 ; 
 SP-CAU ;
 SP-CMPR ;
 SP-DAT-INDEF ;
 SP-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXPL1 ;
 SP-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXPL2 ;
 SP-GEN-INDEF ;
 SP-ILL-PX ;
 SP-ELA-INDEF ;
 SP-INE ;
 SP-LAT-INDEF ;
 SP-PRL_Ova ;
 SP-TRA-INDEF_Oks ;
!!
!! Floating
: NMN_DECLENSION-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL-FLOAT ;
SG-GEN-DEF ; !2023-10-14 кядьготь
 NMN_DECLENSION-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL-LOSE-STEM-VOWEL ;!retain vowel stem
!! Without vowel
+Use/NG:%^RmVow NMN_DECLENSION-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL-LOSE-STEM-VOWEL ;

+Use/NG: SG-NOM-DEF ;
 SP-PRL_Ga ; !2023-08-30 has pair in lose stem vowel
+Use/NG:  SP-ABL ;
:%^RmVow SP-LAT-INDEF ;
! N_KAL ;  Ela, Ill, Ine, Par 
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

LEXICON N_KECHE !!= @CODE@
!!кече:кеч%{ЕØ%}
!! Indef with vowel: Nom Sg, Gen, Dat, Cmpr, Prl, Tra
: SG-NOM-INDEF ;
: NMN_DECLENSION-WITH-ONSET-VOWEL ;

!! Floating
: NMN_DECLENSION-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL-FLOAT ;

!! Without vowel
:%^RmVow NMN_DECLENSION-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL-LOSE-STEM-VOWEL ;
NMN_DECLENSION-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL-RETAIN-STEM-VOWEL ;

! N_KAL ;  Ela, Ill, Ine, Par 
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

LEXICON N_TISHE
! тише:тише
: NMN_TISHE ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

!LEXICON N_TISHE-SG
!! тише:тише
!: NMN_TISHE-SG ;

!LEXICON N_TISHE-PL
!! тише:тише
!: NMN_TISHE-PL ;

!LEXICON N_TISHE-SG/PL
! тише:тише
!: NMN_TISHE-SG/PL ;

LEXICON N_RELAT_PULA !!= @CODE@
+Relat: N_PULA ;
LEXICON N_PULA !!= @CODE@ 
!пула:пул%{АО%}
: NMN_PULA ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

LEXICON N_KARIUC1KE !!= @CODE@
!карюцьке:карюцьк%{АЕ1%}
: NMN_AVA ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;
!€ карюцькат

LEXICON N_SEL1ME !!= @CODE@
!сельме:сельм%{ЕО%}
: NMN_SEL1ME ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

LEXICON N_FS !!= @CODE@
!процесс
: NMN_OSH ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_VAL1MIA ;

LEXICON N_RELAT_OSH
+Relat: N_OSH ;
LEXICON N_OSH !!= @CODE@
!ош:ош
: NMN_OSH ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_VAL1MIA ;

LEXICON N_OSH-PL
!ош:ош
: NMN_OSH-PL ;

LEXICON N_SARAZ !!= @CODE@
!ош:ош
: NMN_SARAZ ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_VAL1MIA ;

!LEXICON N_SARAZ-PL
!!ош:ош
!: NMN_SARAZ-PL ;

LEXICON N_J !!= @CODE@
 N_J-SG ;
 N_J-PL ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

LEXICON N_PEJ !!= @CODE@
 N_PEJ-SG ;
 N_PEJ-PL ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

LEXICON N_J-SG
: NMN_J-SG ;

LEXICON N_J-PL
: NMN_J-PL ;

LEXICON N_PEJ-SG
: NMN_PEJ-SG ;

LEXICON N_PEJ-PL
: NMN_PEJ-PL ;

LEXICON N_K !!= @CODE@
! for development of double-k issues
 N_KAL-SG ;
 N_KAL-PL ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{ЕО%}%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

LEXICON N_FT !!= @CODE@
! for development of double-t issues
 N_KAL-SG ;
 N_KAL-PL ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{ЕО%}%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

LEXICON N_BT !!= @CODE@
! for development of double-t issues
 N_KAL-SG ;
 N_KAL-PL ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{ЕО%}%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

LEXICON N_BN !!= @CODE@
! for development of double-n and affrication issues
 N_KAL-SG ;
 N_KAL-PL ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{ЕО%}%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

LEXICON N_RELAT_KAL
+Relat: N_KAL ;

LEXICON N_KAL !!= @CODE@
 N_KAL-SG ;
 N_KAL-PL ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{ЕО%}%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

LEXICON N_KAL-SG
: NMN_KAL-SG ;

LEXICON N_KAL-PL
: NMN_KAL-PL ;

LEXICON N_T1 !!= @CODE@
 N_KIAL1-SG ;
 N_KIAL1-PL ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+Err/Orth-soft-kept+N:%^ЬKEEP%>ня NMN_AVA ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{ЕО%}%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

LEXICON N_KIAL1 !!= @CODE@
 N_KIAL1-SG ;
 N_KIAL1-PL ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+Err/Orth-soft-kept+N:%^ЬKEEP%>ня NMN_AVA ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{ЕО%}%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

LEXICON N_KIAL1-SG
: NMN_KIAL1-SG ;

LEXICON N_KIAL1-PL
: NMN_KIAL1-PL ;

LEXICON N_PINE_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_PINE ;
LEXICON N_RELAT_PINE !!= @CODE@
+Relat: N_PINE ;
LEXICON N_PINE !!= @CODE@
 N_PINE-SG ;
 N_PINE-PL ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

LEXICON N_PINE-SG
: NMN_PINE-SG ;

LEXICON N_PINE-PL
: NMN_PINE-PL ;

LEXICON N_KELU_rus100 !!= @CODE@
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_KELU ;
LEXICON N_KELU !!= @CODE@
 N_KELU-SG ;
 N_KELU-PL ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA ;

LEXICON N_KELU-SG
: NMN_KELU-SG ;

LEXICON N_KELU-PL
: NMN_KELU-PL ;




!! NMN

LEXICON NMN_AVA
!	NMN_AVA-SG	;
!	NMN_AVA-PL	;
!	NMN_AVA-SG/PL	;
	NMN-SG	;
	NMN-PL	;
	NMN-SG/PL	;
 SP-LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON NMN_AVA-SG
!+Sg+Nom+Indef: K ;
! 	NMN-SG ;
!	NMN-SG/PL	;
! SP-LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON NMN_AVA-PL
	NMN-PL ;
	NMN-SG/PL	;

LEXICON ORDINALS_WITH_CE
+SP+Abl+Indef:цеда # ;
+SP+Ine+Indef:цеса # ;
+SP+Tra+Indef:цекс # ;
+Sg+Dat+Def:цети # ;
+Sg+Gen+Def:цеть # ;
+Sg+Nom+Def:цесь # ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef:це # ;
+Pl+Dat+Def:цетненди # ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:цетнень # ;
+Pl+Nom+Def:цетне # ;


LEXICON NMN_PULA
!	NMN_PULA-SG	;
!	NMN_PULA-PL	;
!	NMN_PULA-SG/PL	;
SG-NOM-INDEF ;
:	NMN-SG	;
:	NMN-PL	;
:	NMN-SG/PL	;
 SP-LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON NMN_PULA-SG
!SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!: 	NMN-SG ;
!:	NMN-SG/PL	;
! SP-LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON NMN_PULA-PL
!	NMN-PL ;
!	NMN-SG/PL	;


LEXICON NMN_TISHE
!	NMN_TISHE-SG	;
!	NMN_TISHE-PL	;
!	NMN_TISHE-SG/PL	;
	NMN-SG	;
	NMN-PL	;
	NMN-SG/PL	;
 SP-LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON NMN_TISHE-SG
!SG-NOM-INDEF ;
! 	NMN-SG ;
!	NMN-SG/PL	;
! SP-LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON NMN_TISHE-PL
!	NMN-PL ;
!	NMN-SG/PL	;


LEXICON NMN_SEL1ME
!	NMN_SEL1ME-SG	;
!	NMN_SEL1ME-PL	;
!	NMN_SEL1ME-SG/PL	;
SG-NOM-INDEF ;
:	NMN-SG	;
:	NMN-PL	;
:	NMN-SG/PL	;
 SP-LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON NMN_SEL1ME-SG
!SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!: 	NMN-SG ;
!:	NMN-SG/PL	;
! SP-LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON NMN_SEL1ME-PL
!	NMN-PL ;
!	NMN-SG/PL	;


LEXICON NMN_VAL1MIA
 SG-NOM-INDEF ;
:%^Я2А        NMN-SG-OBL  ;
:%^Я2А        NMN-PL  ;
:%^Я2А        NMN-SG/PL       ;
:%^Я2А SP-LAT-INDEF ;
!CHECKME
 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;
 PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG1 ;
 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG2 ;
 PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG2 ;
 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3 ;
 PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXSG3 ;
 PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
 SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
 SP-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXPL1 ;
 SP-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXPL2 ;
 SP-GEN-INDEF ;
 SP-DAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON NMN_VAL1MIA-SG
!SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!:%^Я2А        NMN-SG ;
!:%^Я2А        NMN-SG/PL       ;
!:%^Я2А SP-LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON NMN_VAL1MIA-PL
!:%^Я2А        NMN-PL ;
!:%^Я2А        NMN-SG/PL       ;

LEXICON NMN_MOKSHA !уша:уш%{АЕØ%}
:        NMN-SG  ;
:        NMN-PL  ;
:        NMN-SG/PL       ;
: SP-LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON NMN_MOKSHA-SG
!SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!:        NMN-SG ;
!:        NMN-SG/PL       ;
!: SP-LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON NMN_MOKSHA-PL
:        NMN-PL ;
:        NMN-SG/PL       ;

LEXICON NMN_PAKSIA
        NMN-SG  ;
        NMN-PL  ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;
 SP-LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON NMN_PAKSIA-SG
!SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!        NMN-SG ;
!        NMN-SG/PL       ;
! SP-LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON NMN_PAKSIA-PL
        NMN-PL ;
        NMN-SG/PL       ;


!LEXICON NMN_OFTA !!= @CODE@
!!!офта:офт
!NMN-SG ;
!NMN-PL ;
!NMN-SG/PL   ;
!:%^RmVow NMN-SG ;
!:%^RmVow NMN-PL ;
!:%^RmVow NMN-SG/PL   ;
! SP-LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON NMN_OFTA-SG !!= @CODE@
!SG-NOM-INDEF ;
!:%^RmVow NMN-SG ;
!	 NMN-SG ;
!:%^RmVow NMN-SG/PL   ;
!	 NMN-SG/PL   ;
!+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA-SG ;

LEXICON NMN_OFTA-PL !!= @CODE@
:%^RmVow NMN-PL ;
+Use/NG:	 NMN-PL ;
:%^RmVow NMN-SG/PL   ;
+Use/NG:         NMN-SG/PL   ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA-PL ;

!LEXICON NMN_PARA-PL !!= @CODE@
!+Use/NG:%^RmVow NMN-PL ;
!	 NMN-PL ;
!+Use/NG:%^RmVow NMN-SG/PL   ;
!         NMN-SG/PL   ;
!+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>%{DIM%}я NMN_AVA-PL ;
